src/nso-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+V +N +A +NM
+SC +Pres +Fut +Pers +Pot +OC +Lat +Past +Cons +Refl
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3 
+CL1 +CL2 +CL3 +CL4 +CL5 +CL6 +CL7 +CL8 +CL9 +CL10 +CL14 +CL15
+IW +EL +Iq +AN +AL +EG +OLL +OG +AK +AR +AM +ALAL +AFAL +FAL +GO
+FNA +FNE +Loc
+1^1/2 +2^1/2 +1a^1a/2a +2a^1a/2a +3^3/4 +4^3/4 +5^5/6 +6^5/6 +7^7/8 +8^7/8
9^9/10 +10^9/10 +14^14/6 +6^14/6 +15 +16 +17 +18

!mo ba bÙ mo me le ma se di N diN bo fa go 
!ga sa re ke wa ya la tqa bja gwa
! not a good idea to declare these.

! We tag the affixes themselves, in order not to look into the linguistics
! FNA and FNE are the final forms

LEXICON Root
!VerbRoot ; ! No more VerbRoot here, we have a prefix!!! (OCPref)
!NounRoot ; ! No nounroot at all
!AdjRoot ; ! adj as daughter of NCL etc.
VerbPart ;
VPref ;
NCL ;

! NOUNS
! =====

! The class prefixes
! ------------------

LEXICON NCL
mo+1^1/2+:mo NCL1/2 ;
ba+2^1/2+:ba NCL1/2 ;
+1a^1a/2a+:0 NCL1a/2a ;
bÙ+2a^1a/2a+:bÙ NCL1a/2a ;
mo+3^3/4+:mo NCL3/4 ;
me+4^3/4+:me NCL3/4 ;
le+5^5/6+:le NCL5/6 ;
ma+6^5/6+:ma NCL5/6 ;
se+7^7/8+:se NCL7/8 ;
di+8^7/8+:di NCL7/8 ;
N+9^9/10+:n NCL9/10 ;
diN+10^9/10+:din NCL9/10 ;
bo+14^14/6+:bo NCL14/6 ;
ma+6^14/6+:ma NCL14/6 ;
!go+15+:go NCL15 ; ! hey, this is the verb class
fa+16+:fa NCL16 ;
go+17+:go NCL17 ;
mo+18+:mo NCL18 ;
AdjRoot ; ! this to get the adj stems

! The nouns, waiting for their own file(s)
! ---------------------------------------- 

LEXICON NCL1/2 
sadi NDim ;
tho NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL1a/2a 
rrangwane  NDim ;
mma NDim ;
!AdjRoot ;
!No adjectives in 1a/2a

LEXICON NCL3/4 
sela NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL5/6 
sÙgana NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL7/8 
atla NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL9/10 
ku NDim ;
p£a NDim ;
kgo£i NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL14/6 
gÙbÍ NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

!LEXICON NCL15 

LEXICON NCL16 
se NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL17 
dimo NDim ;
AdjRoot ;

LEXICON NCL18 
rago NDim ;
AdjRoot ;


! The postnominal morphology
! --------------------------

LEXICON NDim
+N+Dim:ana NAug ;
+N+Dim:nyana NAug ;
+N+Aug # ;
+N: # ;

LEXICON NAug
!+Aug: NLoc ;
NLoc ;
# ;

LEXICON NLoc
+Loc:go # ;
+Loc:ng # ;
# ;



! Adjectives
! ==========

LEXICON AdjRoot
be A ;
bjalo A ;
bjang A ;
botse A ;
bÍdi A ;
fsa A ;
golo A ;
hlano A ;
hubÍdu A ;
kaaka A ;
kaakang A ;
kae A ;
koto A ;
kÙpana A ;
ngwÍ A ;
nt£i A ;
nyane A ;
nÍ A ;
raro A ;
so A ;
sÍhla A ;
sÍsÍ A ;
tala A ;
tala A ;
thata A ;
tona A ;
tshadi A ;
tÍlÍlÍ A ;
£wÍu A ;

LEXICON A
+A:0 # ;
 
! VERBS
! =====

! Storing the VerbRoot members in a separate file
! But today we have some tests here

LEXICON VPref
n+OC+Sg1+:n VerbRoot ;
i+Refl+:i VerbRoot ;
i+Refl+n+OC+Sg1+:in VerbRoot ;
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON VerbRoot
arab V ;
bÙn V ;
dir V ;
for V ;
fÍl V ;
gopot£ V ;
hlÙmph V ;
hum V ;
i£ V ;
j V ;
jÍ£ V ;
kgop V ;
kgÍth V ;
lom V ;
makat£ V ;
mon V ;
mÙn V ;
neÍl V ;
obe V ;
pal V ;
rat V ;
rÍk V ;
sepel V ;
tseb V ;
u£ V ;
wÍt£ V ;
£upÍt£ V ;
Ím V ;
ÍtÍl V ;
ÙpÍd V ;


!LEXICON VB
!+V+OC+Sg1 VExt ;
!VExt ;
! The b-initials, cf. p. 26, 1st years...

LEXICON V
+V: VExt ;

LEXICON VExt
 +IW:iw VExt ;
 +EL:el VExt ;
 +Iq:iq VExt ;
 +AN:an VExt ;
 +AL:al VExt ;
 +EG:eg VExt ;
 +OLL:oll VExt ;
 +OG:og VExt ;
 +AK:ak VExt ;
 +AR:ar VExt ;
 +AM:am VExt ;
 +ALAL:alal VExt ;
 +AFAL:afal VExt ;
 +FAL:fal VExt ;
 +GO:go VExt ;
 VNext ; 

LEXICON VNext
 +Past:ile # ;
 +FNA:a # ;
 +FNE:e # ;

LEXICON VerbPart


! ontkenningsmorfeme
! ------------------

ga+NM:ga # ;
sa+NM:sa # ;
se+NM:se # ;
ga% se+NM:ga% se # ;


! onderwerpskakels
! ----------------

ke+SC+Sg1:ke # ;
re+SC+Pl1:re # ;
o+SC+Sg2:o # ;
le+SC+Pl2:le # ;
o+SC+CL1:o # ;
ba+SC+CL2:ba # ;
o+SC+CL3:o # ;
e+SC+CL4:e # ;
le+SC+CL5:le # ;
a+SC+CL6:a # ;
se+SC+CL7:se # ;
di+SC+CL8:di # ;
e+SC+CL9:e # ;
di+SC+CL10:di # ;
bo+SC+CL14:bo # ;
go+SC+CL15:go # ;


! konsekutieve skakels
! --------------------

ka+SC+Sg1+Cons:ka # ;
ra+SC+Pl1+Cons:ra # ;
wa+SC+Sg2+Cons:wa # ;
la+SC+Pl2+Cons:la # ;
a+SC+CL1+Cons:a # ;
ba+SC+CL2+Cons:ba # ;
wa+SC+CL3+Cons:wa # ;
ya+SC+CL4+Cons:ya # ;
la+SC+CL5+Cons:la # ;
a+SC+CL6+Cons:a # ;
sa+SC+CL7+Cons:sa # ;
tqa+SC+CL8+Cons:tqa # ;
ya+SC+CL9+Cons:ya # ;
tqa+SC+CL10+Cons:tqa # ;
bja+SC+CL14+Cons:bja # ;
gwa+SC+CL15+Cons:gwa # ;


! Andere 
! ------

a+Pres:a # ;
tlo+Fut:tlo # ;
tla+Fut:tla # ;
sa+Pers:sa # ;
ka+Pot:ka # ;
e+Lat:e # ;


! Voorwerpsskakels
! ----------------

n+OC+Sg1:n # ;
re+OC+Pl1:re # ;
go+OC+Sg2:go # ;
le+OC+Pl2:le # ;
mo+OC+CL1:mo # ;
ba+OC+CL2:ba # ;
o+OC+CL3:o # ;
e+OC+CL4:e # ;
le+OC+CL5:le # ;
a+OC+CL6:a # ;
se+OC+CL7:se # ;
di+OC+CL8:di # ;
e+OC+CL9:e # ;
di+OC+CL10:di # ;
bo+OC+CL14:bo # ;
go+OC+CL15:go # ;
